Hawaii statutes.
§435E-27 Rights of members. Each
member participating in an interindemnity arrangement shall have the right of
access to, and the inspection of, the books and records of the interindemnity
arrangement, subject to reasonable regulation by the board of trustees. [L
1977, c 182, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next